Montana, session 2025, HB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Apprenticeships -- licensure. (1) A board or program shall grant a license listed in
subsection (3) of this section to a person who completes an apprenticeship program under Title 39, chapter 6,
in the relevant occupation or profession.
(2) An applicant for licensure through an apprenticeship program shall meet the same exam and
fee requirements as an applicant who completes an educational program prior to licensure.
(3) The following licenses are subject to the provisions of this section:
(a) for the board of barbers and cosmetologists, Title 37, chapter 31:
(i) barbering;
(ii) barbering nonchemical;
(iii) cosmetology;
(iv) electrology;
(v) esthetics; and
(vi) manicuring;
(b) for the board of behavioral health, Title 37, chapter 39:
(i) addiction counseling; and
(ii) peer support specialist;
(c) for the board of clinical laboratory science practitioners, Title 37, chapter 34, clinical laboratory
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 336
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 336
technician;
(d) for the board of funeral service, Title 37, chapter 19, mortician;
(e) for the board of massage therapy, Title 37, chapter 33, massage therapist;
(f) for the board of medical examiners, Title 37, chapter 3, emergency medical technician;
(g) for the board of nursing, Title 37, chapter 8:
(i) licensed practical nurse;
(ii) medication aide II; and
(iii) registered nurse;
(h) for the board of pharmacy, Title 37, chapter 7, pharmacy technician;
(i) for the board of physical therapy examiners, Title 37, chapter 11, physical therapy assistant;
(j) for the board of plumbers; Title 37, chapter 69, journeyman plumber;
(k) for the board of radiologic technologists, Title 37, chapter 14, radiologic technologist;
(l) for the board of veterinary medicine, Title 37, chapter 18, veterinary technician;
(m) for the department of labor and industry, Title 50, chapter 74:
(i) agricultural class engineer;
(ii) limited low-pressure engineer;
(iii) low-pressure engineer; and
(iv) third-class engineer;
(n) for the department of labor and industry, Title 37, chapter 72, construction blaster;
(o) for the department of labor and industry, Title 50, chapter 76, licensed first-class crane and
hoist engineer;
(p) for the department of labor and industry, Title 37, chapter 73:
(i) elevator contractor;
(ii) elevator inspector; and
(iii) elevator mechanic;
(q) for the department of labor and industry, Title 37, chapter 16, hearing aid dispenser; and
(r) for the state electrical board, Title 37, chapter 68, journeyman electrician.
(4) Each board or program shall adopt rules for the implementation of this section.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 336
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 336
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
37, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 336
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 336, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 336
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER, W. MCKAMEY, E. BUTTREY
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS FOR CERTAIN PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
TYPES; REQUIRING A BOARD OR PROGRAM TO GRANT A LICENSE TO AN APPLICANT WHO
COMPLETES A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED APPRENTICESHIP; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY;
AND PROVIDING LICENSE TYPES ALLOWED IN THE FEDERAL APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM.